Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 1 Children and Youth Services
49-5-12.
Licensing and inspection of child welfare agencies; standards; revocation or refusal of license; penalties; violations.

As used in this Code section, the term “child welfare agency” means any child-caring institution, child-placing agency, children’s transition care center, or maternity home.

All child welfare agencies shall be licensed or commissioned annually by the department in accordance with procedures, standards, rules, and regulations to be established by the board. The board shall develop and publish in print or electronically rules and regulations for licensing or commissioning of child welfare agencies. Child welfare agencies electing to be commissioned rather than licensed shall operate in accordance with the same procedures, standards, rules, and regulations for licensing of child welfare agencies. A license issued to a child-placing agency shall be deemed approval of all foster family homes approved, supervised, and used by the licensed child-placing agency as a part of its work, subject to this article and rules and regulations of the board.

The department shall assist applicants or licensees or persons holding commissions in meeting rules and regulations of the department for child welfare agencies and, if a licensee or person holding a commission is, for any reason, denied renewal of a license or commission or if a license or commission is revoked or if any applicant for a license or commission cannot meet department rules and regulations for child welfare agencies, the department shall assist in planning the placement of children, if any, in the custody of such child welfare agency in some other licensed or commissioned child welfare agency or assist in returning them to their own homes or in making any other plans or provisions as may be necessary and advisable to meet the particular needs of the children involved.

Application for a license or commission shall be made to the department upon forms furnished by the department. Upon receipt of an application for a license or commission and upon presentation by the applicant of evidence that the child welfare agency meets the rules and regulations prescribed by the department, the department shall issue such child welfare agency a license or commission for no more than one year.

If the department finds that any child welfare agency applicant does not meet rules and regulations prescribed by the department but is attempting to meet such rules and regulations, the department may, in its discretion, issue a temporary license or commission to such child welfare agency, but such temporary license or commission shall not be issued for more than a one-year period. Upon presentation of satisfactory evidence that such agency is making progress toward meeting prescribed rules and regulations of the department, the department may, in its discretion, reissue such temporary license or commission for one additional period not to exceed one year. As an alternative to a temporary license or commission, the department, in its discretion, may issue a restricted license or commission which states the restrictions on its face.

Noncompliance with the rules and regulations for child welfare agencies as adopted by the Board of Human Services which are designated in writing to the facilities as being related to children’s health and safety;

Flagrant and continued operation of an unlicensed or uncommissioned facility in contravention of the law; or

Prior license or commission denial or revocation within one year of application.

Child-caring institutions and child-placing agencies, when licensed in accordance with this Code section, may receive needy or dependent children from their parents, guardians, custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis for special, temporary, or continued care. Parents, guardians, custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis to such children may sign releases or agreements giving to such institutions or agencies custody and control over such children during the period of care. Children’s transition care centers may receive medically fragile children from their parents, guardians, custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis for special, temporary, or continued care to facilitate transitions from a hospital or other facility to a home or other appropriate setting.

(i.1)

A children’s transition care center shall serve no more than six children per residence or 16 children per campus at a time. Children’s transition care center services shall be available to all families in this state, including those whose care is paid for through the Department of Community Health or the Department of Human Services or by insurance companies that cover home health care services or private duty nursing care in the home. Each children’s transition care center location shall be physically separate and apart from any other facility licensed by the Department of Human Services under this chapter and shall provide one or more of the following services: respite care, registered nursing or licensed practical nursing care, transitional care for the facilitation of transitions to a home or other appropriate setting and reunion of families, medical day care, weekend camps, and diagnostic studies typically done in the home setting.

(f )

The department shall refuse a license or commission upon a showing of:

(g)

All licensed or commissioned child welfare agencies shall prominently display the license or commission issued to such agency by the department at some point near the entrance of the premises of such agency that is open to view by the public.

(h)

The department’s action revoking or refusing to renew or issue a license or commission required by this Code section shall be preceded by notice and opportunity for a hearing and shall constitute a contested case within the meaning of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” except that only 30 days’ notice in writing from the commissioner’s designee shall be required prior to license or commission revocation and except that hearings held relating to such action by the department may be closed to the public if the hearing officer determines that an open hearing would be detrimental to the physical or mental health of any child who will testify at that hearing.

(j)

Child-placing agencies, in placing children in foster family homes, shall safeguard the welfare of such children by thoroughly investigating each such home and the character and reputation of the persons residing therein and shall adequately supervise each home during the period of care. All children placed in foster family homes shall, as far as is practicable, be placed with persons of the same religious faith as the children themselves or the children’s parents.

(k)

It shall be the duty of the department to inspect at regular intervals all licensed or commissioned child welfare agencies within the state, including foster family homes used by such child-placing agencies. The department shall have right of entrance, privilege of inspection, and right of access to all children under the care and control of the licensee or commissionee.

(l)

If any flagrant abuses, derelictions, or deficiencies are made known to the department or its duly authorized agents during their inspection of any child welfare agency or if, at any time, such are reported to the department, the department shall immediately investigate such matters and take such action as conditions may require.

(m)

If abuses, derelictions, or deficiencies are found in the operation and management of any child welfare agency, they shall be brought immediately to the attention of the management of such agency; and if correctable, but not corrected within a reasonable time, the department shall revoke the license or commission of such agency in the manner prescribed in this Code section.

(n)

The department may require periodic reports from child welfare agencies in such forms and at such times as the department may prescribe.

(o)

Child welfare agencies and other facilities and institutions wherein children and youths are detained which are operated by any department or agency of state, county, or municipal government shall not be subject to licensure under this Code section, but the department may, through its authorized agents, make periodic inspections of such agencies, facilities, and institutions. Reports of such inspections shall be made privately to the proper authorities in charge of such agencies, facilities, or institutions. The department shall cooperate with such authorities in the development of standards that will adequately protect the health and well-being of all children and youths detained in such agencies, facilities, and institutions or provided care by them. The department may recommend changes in programs and policies and if, within a reasonable time, the standards established by the department and the recommendations of the department are not met, it shall be the duty of the commissioner to make public in the community in which such agency, facility, or institution is located the report of the above-mentioned inspection and the changes recommended by the department. If any serious abuses, derelictions, or deficiencies are found and are not corrected within a reasonable time, the commissioner shall report them in writing to the Governor.

(p)

Any child welfare agency that shall operate without a license or commission issued by the department shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $500.00 nor more than $1,000.00 for each such offense. Each day of operation without a license or commission shall constitute a separate offense.

(q)

No person, official, agency, hospital, maternity home, or institution, public or private, in this state shall receive or accept a child under 17 years of age for placement or adoption or place such a child, either temporarily or permanently, in a home other than the home of the child’s relatives without having been licensed or commissioned by the department. Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 49-5-12.1, violation of this subsection shall be punishable by a fine of not less than $500.00 nor exceeding $1,000.00 for each offense. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit a properly licensed attorney at law from providing necessary legal services and counsel to parties engaged in or contemplating adoption proceedings. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit an individual seeking to:

(1)

Adopt a child or children from receiving or accepting a child or children in the individual’s home in anticipation of filing a petition for adoption under Article 1 of Chapter 8 of Title 19; or

(2)

Have that individual’s child or children placed for adoption from placing that individual’s child or children in the home of an individual who is not related to the child or children in anticipation of the individual’s initiation of adoption proceedings pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 8 of Title 19.

(r)

The department may, without regard to the availability of other remedies, including administrative remedies, seek an injunction against the continued operation of a child welfare agency without a license or commission or the continued operation of a child welfare agency in willful violation of this article or of any regulation of the department or in violation of any order of the board.

(s)

The term “licensed child welfare agency” shall include a commissioned child welfare agency and any references in this Code to a licensed child welfare agency, including criminal, administrative, and civil provisions applicable to licensed child welfare agencies, shall include and apply to commissioned child welfare agencies unless otherwise provided in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, §§ 3, 14; Ga. L. 1967, p. 772, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 560, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 49; Ga. L. 1982, p. 706, §§ 1, 3, 9, 10; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 49; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1038, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1435, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 217, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1795, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 49; Ga. L. 1991, p. 408, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1640, § 13; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 49; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49; Ga. L. 1994, p. 650, § 4; Ga. L. 2004, p. 645, § 9; Ga. L. 2004, p. 1085, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 1145, § 2/HB 984; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 2-2, 2-3/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 800, § 6/HB 388; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2013, p. 135, § 11/HB 354; Ga. L. 2016, p. 773, § 6/HB 905; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 49/HB 323.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted former subsection (t), which read: “The department shall recommend in writing to the owner of any facility operated as a day-care center, family day-care home, group day-care facility, or group day-care home or any child learning center licensed by the Department of Early Care and Learning that such facility carry liability insurance coverage sufficient to protect the facility’s clients. Any such facility which after receiving such recommendation is not covered by liability insurance shall post that fact in a conspicuous place in the facility and shall notify the parent or guardian of each child under the care of the facility in writing. Such notice shall be in at least 1/2 inch letters. Each such parent or guardian must acknowledge receipt of such notice in writing and a copy of such acknowledgment shall be maintained on file at the facility at all times while the child attends the facility and for 12 months after the child’s last date of attendance. Failure to do so may subject the owner of the facility to a civil fine of $1,000.00 for each such infraction.”

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “$500.00 nor more than $1,000.00” for “$50.00 nor more than $200.00” in the first sentence of subsection (p); and substituted “$500.00 nor exceeding $1,000.00” for “$100.00 nor exceeding $500.00” in the second sentence of subsection (q).

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “, as defined in subsection (a) of this Code section,” following “agencies” near the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (b).

Cross references.

Applicability of Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children regarding requirements for visitation, inspection, or supervision of children, homes, institutions, or other agencies in another state which is party to compact, §

39-4-10

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 800, § 1/HB 388, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Option of Adoption Act.’ ”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Group day care homes, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources, Family & Children Services; Child Care Institutions, Chapters 290-2-1 et seq.

Immunization of children as a prerequisite to admission to schools and other facilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-4.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 57 (1992).

For note on the 1994 amendment of this Code section, see 11 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 126 (1994).

49-5-12.1.
Penalties for violation of child welfare agency laws and regulations.

Unless otherwise provided in subsection (r) of Code Section 49-5-12, any person who violates the provisions of Code Section 49-5-12 or who hinders, obstructs, or otherwise interferes with any representative of the department in the discharge of that person’s official duties in making inspections as provided in Code Section 49-5-12 or in investigating complaints as provided in Code Section 49-5-12 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who:

Violates any licensing or registration provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued under this chapter or any term, condition, or limitation of any license or registration certificate under this chapter thereby subjecting a child in care to injury or a life-threatening situation; or

Commits any violation for which a license or registration certificate may be revoked under rules or regulations issued pursuant to this chapter

may be subject to a civil penalty, to be imposed by the department, not to exceed $500.00. If any violation is a continuing one, each day of such violation shall constitute a separate violation for the purpose of computing the applicable civil penalty.

Whenever the department proposes to subject a person to the imposition of a civil penalty under this subsection, it shall notify such person in writing:

Setting forth the date, facts, and nature of each act or omission with which the person is charged;

Specifically identifying the particular provision or provisions of the Code section, rule, regulation, order, license, or registration certificate involved in the violation; and

Advising of each penalty which the department proposes to impose and its amount.

Such written notice shall be sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery by the department to the last known address of such person. The person so notified shall be granted an opportunity to show in writing, within such reasonable period as the department shall by rule or regulation prescribe, why such penalty should not be imposed. The notice shall also advise such person that, upon failure to pay the civil penalty subsequently determined by the department, if any, the penalty may be collected by civil action. Any person upon whom a civil penalty is imposed may appeal such action pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

A civil penalty finally determined under this Code section may be collected by civil action in the event that such penalty is not paid as required. On the request of the department, the Attorney General is authorized to institute a civil action to collect a penalty imposed pursuant to this subsection. The Attorney General shall have the exclusive power to compromise, mitigate, or remit such civil penalties as are referred to the Attorney General for collection.

All moneys collected from civil penalties shall be paid to the state for deposit in the general fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-12.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1038, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

49-5-12.2.
Immunity from liability.

Any caregiver or other entity under contract with the department shall be immune from civil liability as a result of a caregiver’s approval of the participation of a child, who is in the custody of the department, in an age or developmentally appropriate activity, so long as such caregiver or other entity under contract with the department acts in accordance with the reasonable and prudent parent standard. No provision in any agreement between the department and a caregiver or an entity under contract with the department shall diminish the standard of care provided in this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-12.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 7/SB 138.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2015.

49-5-12.3.
Definitions; annual inspection of child welfare agency.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Affected agency” means any state agency, department, division, or office which requires a license or commission from the department for child welfare agencies, including, but not limited to, the Division of Family and Children Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, or the Department of Community Health.

“Annual inspection” means an inspection of a child welfare agency’s facility, books, minutes, financial statements, files, employees, programs, and contracts to ensure contract compliance and licensure compliance.

“Child welfare agency” means any child-caring institution, child-placing agency, children’s transition care center, or maternity home.

“Contract compliance” means adherence to the terms of a contract a child welfare agency has with an affected agency to provide child welfare services.

“Licensure compliance” means adherence to licensing or commissioning requirements established pursuant to and in accordance with Code Section 49-5-12.

The department shall ensure that the annual inspection of each child welfare agency is performed by all affected agencies in a singular coordinated manner. Affected agencies shall not duplicate the annual inspection but shall cooperate and assist the department with the annual inspection. Affected agencies shall share the results of the annual inspection with other applicable affected agencies.

The annual inspection shall not occur sooner than 330 days or later than 390 days after the date on which the last annual inspection began and shall not exceed five days. Affected agencies may reduce the extent of the annual inspection by reducing the frequency or the extent of the inspection for contract compliance when the child welfare agency has shown an exceptional history of contract compliance as determined upon past scores; provided, however, that such reduction does not violate federal law, court order, or settlement agreement.

A child welfare agency may contest the results of an annual inspection, in accordance with department rules, by filing a written appeal with the affected agency within ten days of receipt of the affected agency’s annual inspection report. Within ten days of receipt of a child welfare agency’s written appeal of the annual inspection, the affected agency shall hold a meeting with the child welfare agency. The meeting shall be for the parties to discuss the annual inspection.

The annual inspection shall not limit the ability of affected agencies and other state departments, divisions, and agencies to ensure the safety and well-being of children in the care of child welfare agencies or to inspect, investigate, or respond as required by court order, settlement agreement, or federal law.

In consultation with other affected agencies, the department shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with this Code section, including establishing criteria which must be met in order for a child welfare agency to contest or appeal an evaluation.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to affect the ability of any affected agency, in its sole discretion, to contract with any child welfare agency or to exercise the rights of the affected agency under the terms and conditions of any existing contract with a child welfare agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-12.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 773, § 7/HB 905; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 49/HB 323.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “results of the annual inspection” for “results of annual inspection” near the end of the last sentence of subsection (b).

49-5-13.
Private child care learning centers not required to meet federal adult-child ratio.

Nothing in this article or any rules and regulations adopted hereunder shall be construed to require that private child care learning centers maintain a ratio of adults to children under care that is commensurate with any federal requirement concerning such adult to child ratio.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 720, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 135, § 12/HB 354.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “child care learning centers” for “day-care centers” in the middle of this Code section.

49-5-14.
[Reserved] Fire inspections of day-care homes and centers; fire safety codes.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1642, § 1, effective July 1, 1985.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1984, p. 706, §§ 4, 5, 11; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 49.

Section 3 of the Act which repealed this Code section provided that nothing in the Act would amend or repeal the definitions contained in Chapter 5 of Title 49.

49-5-15.
Notice as to child brought into state for placement or adoption; bond; certificate as to foster home; reports.

No person shall bring or send into the state any child for the purpose of placing him or procuring his adoption without first filing notice with the department. He shall file with the department a bond payable to the state for each child he intends to send or bring, approved by the department, in the penal sum of $1,000.00, conditioned that he will not send or bring into the state any child who is incorrigible or unsound in mind or body; that he will remove any such child who becomes a public charge or who, in the opinion of the department, becomes a menace to the community prior to his adoption or becoming of legal age; and that the person with whom the child is placed shall be responsible for his proper care and training. Before any child shall be brought or sent into the state for the purpose of placing him in a foster home, the person so bringing or sending such child shall first notify the department of his intention and shall obtain from the department a certificate stating that such home is, in the opinion of the department, a suitable home for the child. Such notification shall state the name, age, and personal description of the child; the name and address of the person with whom the child is to be placed; and such other information as may be required by the department. The person bringing or sending such child into the state shall report at least once each year and at such other times as the department shall direct as to the location and well-being of the child so long as such child shall remain within the state and until he shall have reached the age of 18 or shall have been legally adopted.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 15.

Cross references.

Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, T. 39, C. 4.

49-5-16.
Power of department to contract; acceptance of children from federal courts for compensation.

The department shall have the power and is authorized:

To enter into contracts with federal, state, county, and municipal governments and their agencies and departments; public and private institutions and agencies of this and other states; and individuals, as may be necessary or desirable in effectuating the purposes of this article;

To enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with county or district departments of family and children services as may be necessary or desirable in effectuating the purposes of this article;

To enter into reciprocal agreements with appropriate public and private institutions and agencies of other states relative to providing child welfare and youth services to nonresident children and youths; and to cooperate with such institutions and agencies in establishment and operation of group-care facilities appropriate for social study, treatment, and rehabilitation of children and youths; and

To accept children and youths from federal courts and provide them social services within the scope of this article for compensation and under such terms as may be agreed upon.

The board may authorize the commissioner to enter into contracts and agreements provided for in this Code section subject to the approval of the board or may, through appropriate action of the board, delegate such authority to the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 17.

49-5-17.
Power of department to accept and use gifts.

The department is authorized and empowered to receive, accept, hold, and use, on behalf of the state and for purposes provided for in this article, gifts, grants, donations, devises, and bequests of real, personal, and mixed property of every kind and description.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 18.

49-5-18.
Instituting or intervening in legal proceedings.

The commissioner is authorized to institute or to intervene in any legal proceedings necessary to the performance of duties and responsibilities of the department and to the enforcement of this article and provisions of policies, standards, rules, and regulations established by the board in conformity with this article as may be commensurate with the legal status of the department to a child or youth committed to the care, custody, or control of the department or as may otherwise be specifically provided for in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 19.

49-5-19.
Annual report on children and youth services.

The commissioner shall prepare and publish in print or electronically an annual report on the operations of the department and of county departments of family and children services under this article and submit it to the Governor, the board, and all interested persons, officials, agencies, and groups, public or private. The report shall contain, in addition to information, statistics, and data required by other provisions of this article, a comprehensive analysis of performance of child welfare and youth services throughout the state; an analysis of goals to ensure that no more than 25 percent of children remain in the foster care system under Title IV-E of the Social Security Act for a period of 24 months or longer, as provided by Public Law 96-272; and such other information and recommendations of the commissioner as may be suitable.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 20; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1120, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 8/SB 138.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “ensure that no more than 25 percent of children remain in the foster care system under Title IV-E of the Social Security Act” for “reduce by 1 percent each year, beginning with the fiscal year that starts October 1, 1983, the number of children who have been in family or institutional foster care” in this Code section.

U.S. Code.

Public Law 96-272, the federal Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980, is codified in numerous provisions of Title 42 of the U.S. Code.

49-5-20.
Existing charters of charitable institutions.

Nothing in this article shall be deemed to revoke any charter of incorporation of any orphans’ home or charitable or benevolent institution incorporated and established under the Act of the General Assembly approved December 18, 1894 (Ga. L. 1894, p. 80), as amended by the Act of the General Assembly approved December 16, 1898 (Ga. L. 1898, p. 104), notwithstanding the repeal of such Acts by Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, Section 24, or to impair or diminish the rights, powers, or privileges of such corporation as provided in its charter of incorporation.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 22; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49.

49-5-21.
Penalties for aiding, harboring, or encouraging escapees or hindering their apprehension.

Any person who shall knowingly aid, assist, or encourage any child or youth under the lawful control or custody of the department or of any licensed child welfare agency or home or facility used by such agency, public or private, to escape or to attempt to escape its control or custody shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who shall knowingly harbor, shelter, entertain, or encourage any child or youth who has escaped the lawful custody or control of the department or of any licensed child welfare agency or home or facility used by such agency, public or private, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who shall knowingly hinder the apprehension of any child under the lawful control or custody of the department who has been placed by the department in one of its institutions or facilities and who has escaped therefrom or who has been placed under supervision and is alleged to have broken the conditions thereof shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 81, § 16; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1066, § 2.

49-5-22.
Voluntary pre-kindergarten programs to provide toilet facilities screened for privacy.

The General Assembly finds that just as gender separated toileting among nonrelatives is the norm among adults, children should be allowed the same opportunity to practice modesty when independent toileting behavior is well established among the majority of their age group. Standardized adherence to this policy would provide privacy, injury control, and sanitation.

Each public or private voluntary pre-kindergarten program in this state which receives state funding shall provide toilet facilities for the four-year-old pre-kindergarten age children which it serves which are suitably screened for privacy. Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to require a pre-kindergarten program to provide separately constructed toilet facilities.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section shall not apply to any voluntary pre-kindergarten program which provides separate and gender-specific toilet facilities for the children which it serves.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 991, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 49.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “four-year-old” was substituted for “four year old” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

49-5-23.
Obtaining information on recall notices.

Any agency, department, or office that regulates child welfare agencies shall make available to such child welfare agencies at the time of application for initial or renewal certification or licensure information concerning contacting the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission to obtain recall notices on unsafe child and infant products.

Child welfare agencies shall post the phone number and website of the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission in a location visible to parents and visitors. The notice shall also advise such parents and visitors on how to obtain recall notices on unsafe child and infant products.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 333, § 1.